Vermont, session 2025-2026, H12.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. BLENDERIZED TUBE FEEDING STUDY COMMITTEE; REPORT
(a) Creation. There is created the Blenderized Tube Feeding Study
Committee to explore the benefits of and recommend ways to reduce barriers
to blenderized tube feeding, which is the use of blended foods and liquids
given directly through a feeding tube.
(b) Membership. The Committee shall be composed of the following
members:
(1) the Commissioner of Health or designee;
(2) the Commissioner for Children and Families or designee;
VT LEG #378941 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.12
2025 Page 2 of 4
(3) a representative of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets
with expertise in access to fresh foods or farmers markets, or both, appointed
by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets;
(4) a caregiver who currently administers blenderized tube feeding,
appointed by the Vermont Family Network;
(5) a pediatric gastroenterologist who is familiar with both blenderized
tube feeding and commercial enteral nutrition products, appointed by the
Vermont Medical Society; and
(6) a dietitian certified pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 73 whose practice
includes working with children who are tube fed, appointed by the Vermont
Academy of Nutrition and Dietetics in consultation with the Office of
Professional Regulation’s dietitian advisors.
(c) Powers and duties. The Committee shall study issues related to
blenderized tube feeding, including the following:
(1) evaluating the benefits, challenges, costs, and barriers to blenderized
tube feeding, especially for children, including:
(A) the impact of blenderized tube feeding on feeding intolerance,
such as gagging, vomiting, and acid reflux;
(B) the impact of blenderized tube feeding on patients’ needs for
medications, such as laxatives and stomach acid blockers;
VT LEG #378941 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.12
2025 Page 3 of 4
(C) the impact of blenderized tube feeding on patients’ overall health,
including on the need for hospitalization, as well as on patient and family well-
being and quality of life;
(D) the costs associated with procuring fresh food and a high-quality
blender to use for blenderized tube feeding;
(E) the availability of health insurance coverage for fresh food and a
high-quality blender compared with the coverage provided for commercial
enteral nutrition products; and
(F) the extent to which health care professionals are aware of the
benefits of blenderized tube feeding and have the time and ability to educate
and support families in utilizing it; and
(2) identifying changes in policy or practice, or both, that would be
necessary to expand access to blenderized tube feeding to more patients,
including children, who would benefit from it.
(d) Assistance. The Committee shall have the administrative, technical,
and legal assistance of the Department of Health.
(e) Report. On or before January 15, 2026, the Committee shall report to
the House Committees on Health Care and on Human Services and the Senate
Committee on Health and Welfare with its findings and any recommendations
for legislative action.
(f) Meetings.
VT LEG #378941 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.12
2025 Page 4 of 4
(1) The Commissioner of Health or designee shall be the chair and shall
call the first meeting of the Committee to occur on or before July 1, 2025.
(2) A majority of the membership shall constitute a quorum.
(3) The Committee shall cease to exist on January 15, 2026.
(g) Compensation and reimbursement. Members of the Committee shall be
entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted
under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than five meetings. These payments shall
be made from monies appropriated to the Department of Health.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #378941 v.1